Mississippi, session 2026, HB162.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. The Legislature finds that significant efforts are under way to improve mathematics and science instruction in Mississippi's public schools through development and adoption of new learning standards, identification of aligned curriculum and expanded opportunities for professional development for teachers.  A significant emphasis also has been placed on improving career and technical education programs focused on high-demand programs.  Middle schools successfully have served students in career and technical programs rich in science, technology, engineering and mathematics.  The Legislature concludes that opportunities for hands-on and applied learning in these programs should be extended to middle school students on an ongoing, statewide basis so that all students are prepared to take advantage of more advanced coursework in high school and postsecondary education. SECTION 2. (1)  All public middle schools shall provide a program, directly or in cooperation with a community or junior college or another school district, for students whose educational plans include application for entrance to a baccalaureate-granting institution after being granted a high school diploma. The program must be designed to help these students meet at least the minimum college entrance requirements. (2)  All middle schools of the state shall provide a program, directly or in cooperation with a community or junior college, skills center, apprenticeship program or another school district, for students who plan to pursue career or work opportunities other than entrance to a baccalaureate-granting institution after being granted a high school diploma.  These programs must: (a)  Help students demonstrate the application of essential academic learning requirements to the world of work, occupation-specific skills, knowledge of more than one (1) career in a chosen pathway, and employability and leadership skills; and (b)  Help students demonstrate the knowledge and skill needed to prepare for industry certification or matriculation to postsecondary education and training programs. (3)  A middle school that receives approval from the State Department of Education to provide a career and technical program in science, technology, engineering or mathematics directly to students shall receive necessary funding to operate this program. Additionally, a middle school that provides a hands-on experience in science, technology, engineering or mathematics with an integrated curriculum of academic content and career and technical education which includes a career and technical education exploratory component also shall qualify for career and technical education funding. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.